Missouri, session 2026, HB2395.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 701.040 and 701.046, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 701.040 and 701.046, to read as follows:
701.040. [1.] The department of health and senior services shall:
(1) Develop by September 1, 1995, a state standard for the location, size of sewage
tanks and length of lateral lines based on the [percolation or permeability rate of the] soil
properties, construction, installation, and operation of on-site sewage disposal systems.
Advice from the department of natural resources shall be considered. City or county
governments may adopt, by order or ordinance, the state standard in accordance with the
provisions of sections 701.025 to 701.059. In any jurisdiction where a city or county has not
adopted the state standard, the department of health and senior services shall enforce the state
standard until such time as the city or county adopts the standard;
(2) Define by rule a list of [those persons who are qualified to perform the percolation
tests or] on-site soil evaluators registered by the department to conduct soils morphology
[tests] evaluations required by the state standard. The list shall include the following:
(a) Persons trained and certified by either the department, which shall include on-site
sewage disposal system contractors or a certified agent of the department;
(b) Licensed professional engineers as defined in section 327.011;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2395 2
(c) Sanitarians meeting standards defined by the department;
(d) Qualified geologists as defined in section [256.501] 256.453; and
(e) "Soil scientists", defined as a person that has successfully completed at least
fifteen semester credit hours of soils science course work, including at least three hours of
course work in soil morphology and interpretations;
(3) Develop in accordance with sections 701.053 to 701.055 a voluntary registration
program for on-site sewage disposal system contractors. Approved county programs shall
implement the contractor registration program. In any area where a county has not adopted,
by order or ordinance, the contractor registration program, the department shall implement
the program until such time as the county adopts the registration program;
(4) Establish an education training program specifically developed for contractors and
city and county employees. [Contractors may be taught and allowed to perform percolation
tests.] Reasonable fees may be charged of the participants to cover the cost of the training
and shall be deposited in the public health services fund created in section 192.900. The
department shall provide, as a part of the education training program, an installation manual
for on-site sewage disposal systems. The manual shall also be made available, at the cost of
publication and distribution, to persons not participating in the education and training
program;
(5) [Periodically review, but not more than annually, any county's or city's ordinance
or order and enforcement record to assure that the state standard is being consistently and
appropriately enforced. In its review the department shall assess the timeliness of the
county's or city's inspections of on-site sewage systems, and county or city enforcement may
be terminated if the department determines that the county or city is unable to provide prompt
inspections. If the department determines that the standard is not being consistently or
appropriately enforced in any city or county, the department shall notify the county or city of
the department's intent to enforce the standard in that jurisdiction and after thirty days' notice
hold a public hearing in such county or city to make a determination as to whether the state
shall enforce the state standard. Any city or county aggrieved by a decision of the department
may appeal a decision of the department to the state board of health and senior services
established under section 191.400. Any city or county aggrieved by a decision of the state
board of health and senior services may appeal that decision to the administrative hearing
commission in the manner provided in section 621.120] Administer, in accordance with
sections 701.025 to 701.059, a mandatory registration program requiring continuing
education before January 1, 2027, for on-site wastewater treatment system professionals
qualified to perform percolation tests in accordance with the standards promulgated
under subdivision (1) of this section. Before January 1, 2027, if a soil morphology
evaluation cannot be reasonably obtained, a percolation test may be accepted, at the

HB 2395 3
discretion of the administrative authority. The provisions of this subdivision shall be
void and of no effect after December 31, 2026; and
(6) Promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions
of sections 701.025 to 701.059.
[2. Subdivision (5) of this section shall be void and of no effect after January 1,
1998.]
701.046. Except as otherwise provided in section 701.031, no person may, on or after
September 1, 1995, construct or make a major modification or major repair to an on-site
sewage disposal system without first notifying the city, county or department and completing
an application, upon a form provided by the department[, and]; submitting [a] an application
fee in the amount established by the city, county or department; and obtaining a
construction permit. [The fee shall be set at an amount no greater than that necessary to
cover the cost to implement the state standard for on-site sewage disposal systems and the
registration of contractors.] For areas of the state where the department is enforcing the state
standard or registering contractors, the department shall [establish the fee, by rule, at an
amount not greater than ninety dollars. The department may charge an additional fee, as
necessary, to cover the expenses of training those contractors electing to perform the
percolation tests] promulgate regulations establishing the conditions and requirements
for the construction permit application, including the collection of reasonable fees. The
fees shall be set at a level to produce revenue that shall not exceed the cost and expense
of administering the provisions of sections 701.025 to 701.059. The application form shall
require such information necessary to show that the on-site sewage disposal system will
comply with the state standard. Such fees, when collected by the department, shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri public health services fund. The
department shall provide technical assistance regarding the type and location of the system to
be installed when processing applications received under sections 701.046 to 701.048 and
701.050. Fees collected by the department shall be deposited in the Missouri public health
services fund created in section 192.900 and shall be used to implement sections 701.025 to
701.059 and for no other purpose.
✔